Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
CLEAN ENERGY TARGETS
SECTION 1.
Definitions. As used in sections 1 to 15 of this 2021 Act:
(1) “Baseline emissions level” means:
(a) For an electric company, the average annual emissions  of greenhouse gas for the
years 2010, 2011 and  2012 associated with the electricity sold to retail electricity consumers
as reported under ORS 468A.280, or rules adopted pursuant thereto.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, for an electricity  service sup-
plier, 0.428 metric tons  of carbon dioxide equivalent per megawatt-hour associated with the
electricity sold by the electricity service supplier to retail electricity  consumers as reported
under ORS 468A.280, or rules adopted pursuant thereto.
(c) For an  electricity service supplier that is first certified under ORS 757.649 on or after
the effective date of sections  1 to 15 of this 2021 Act, the baseline emissions level defined in
paragraph (b) of this subsection shall be adjusted downward in the certification of the elec-
tricity service supplier under ORS 757.649 to a level that:
(A) Reflects the continual progress made by other electricity service  suppliers toward
meeting the clean energy targets set forth in section 3  of this 2021 Act, as demonstrated
under section 5 (3) of this 2021 Act; and
(B) Prevents the creation of a competitive disadvantage among electricity service  sup-
pliers.
(2) “Community-based renewable  energy” means one or more renewable energy systems
that interconnect to utility distribution or transmission assets and may be combined with
microgrids, storage systems or demand response measures, or  energy-related infrastructure
that promotes climate resiliency or other such measures, and that:
(a) Provide a direct benefit to a particular community through a  community-benefits
agreement or direct ownership by a  local government, nonprofit community organization or
federally recognized Indian tribe; or
Enrolled House Bill 2021 (HB 2021-C) Page 1
(b) Result in increased resiliency or community stability, local jobs, economic  develop-
ment or direct energy cost savings to families and small businesses.
(3) “Electric company,” “electricity  service supplier” and “electric utility” have the
meanings given those terms in ORS 757.600.
(4) “Environmental justice” means equal protection  from environmental and health haz-
ards and meaningful public participation in  decisions that affect the environment in which
people live, work, learn, practice spirituality and play.
(5) “Environmental justice communities” includes communities of color,  communities
experiencing lower incomes, tribal communities, rural communities, coastal communities,
communities with limited infrastructure  and other communities traditionally underrepre-
sented in public processes and adversely harmed by  environmental and health hazards, in-
cluding seniors, youth and persons with disabilities.
(6) “Greenhouse gas” has the meaning given that term in ORS 468A.210.
(7) “Nonemitting electricity” means  electricity, including hydroelectricity, that is gener-
ated and may be stored in a manner that does not emit greenhouse gas into the  atmosphere.
(8) “Retail electricity consumer” means a retail electricity consumer, as  defined in ORS
757.600, that is serviced by a retail electricity provider and located in this state.
(9) “Retail electricity provider” means  an electric company or electricity service supplier.
SECTION 2.
Policy. It is the policy of the State of Oregon:
(1) That retail electricity providers rely  on nonemitting electricity in accordance with the
clean energy targets set forth in  section 3 of this 2021 Act and eliminate greenhouse gas
emissions associated with serving Oregon retail electricity consumers by 2040;
(2) That electricity generated in a manner that produces  zero greenhouse gas emissions
also be generated, to the maximum extent practicable,  in a manner that provides additional
direct benefits to  communities in this state in the forms of creating and sustaining mean-
ingful living wage jobs, promoting  workforce equity and increasing energy security and
resiliency;
(3) That, under  existing federal and state law, the state engages in meaningful consulta-
tion with  federally recognized Indian tribes. This includes consultation on the siting, per-
mitting and construction  of new energy facilities as defined in ORS 469.300, and new projects
subject to the policy specified in 18 C.F.R. 2.1c, prior to such actions that  are likely to ad-
versely impact designated sites of archeological significance as defined in ORS 358.905, or
properties of traditional, cultural and religious importance under the National Historical
Preservation Act and the 36 C.F.R. 800 implementing regulation; and
(4) That implementation of sections  1 to 15 of this 2021 Act be done in a manner that
minimizes burdens for environmental justice communities.
SECTION 3.
Clean energy targets.  (1) A retail electricity  provider shall reduce
greenhouse gas emissions,  measured for an electric company as greenhouse gas emissions
reported under ORS 468A.280, and measured for an electricity service supplier as  greenhouse
gas emissions per megawatt-hour as reported under ORS 468A.280, to the extent compliance
is consistent with sections 1 to 15 of this 2021 Act, by the following targets:
(a) By 2030, 80 percent below baseline emissions level.
(b) By 2035, 90 percent below baseline emissions level.
(c) By 2040, and for every subsequent year, 100 percent below baseline emissions level.
(2) Nothing in sections 1 to 15  of this 2021 Act may be construed as establishing a
standard that requires a retail electricity provider to track electricity to end use  retail cus-
tomers.
SECTION 4.
Clean energy plans; electric companies.  (1) An electric company shall develop
a clean energy plan for meeting the  clean energy targets set forth in section 3 of this 2021
Act concurrent with the development of each integrated resource plan.
(2) The electric company shall submit the clean energy plan to the  Public Utility Com-
mission and the Department of Environmental Quality.
Enrolled House Bill 2021 (HB 2021-C) Page 2
(3)(a) A clean energy plan must be based on or included in  an integrated resource plan
filing made no earlier than January 1, 2022, and  filed no later than 180 days after the inte-
grated resource plan is filed, or developed within an integrated resource planning process and
incorporated into the integrated resource plan filed with the commission.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a)  of this subsection, a clean energy plan developed by a
multistate jurisdictional electric company must be  based on or contained in other informa-
tion developed consistent with a cost-allocation methodology approved by the commission.
(4) A clean energy plan must:
(a) Incorporate the clean energy targets set forth in section 3 of this 2021 Act;
(b) Include annual goals set by the electric company for actions that make progress  to-
wards meeting the clean energy targets set forth in section 3 of  this 2021 Act, including ac-
quisition of nonemitting generation resources, energy  efficiency measures and acquisition
and use of demand response resources;
(c) Include a risk-based examination of resiliency  opportunities that includes costs, con-
sequences, outcomes and benefits based on reasonable  and prudent industry resiliency
standards and guidelines established by the Public Utility Commission;
(d) Examine the costs and opportunities of offsetting energy generated from fossil fuels
with community-based renewable energy;
(e) Demonstrate the electric  company is making continual progress within the planning
period towards meeting the clean energy targets set forth  in section 3 of this 2021 Act, in-
cluding demonstrating a projected reduction of annual greenhouse gas emissions; and
(f) Result in an affordable, reliable and clean electric system.
(5) Actions  and investments proposed in a clean energy plan may include the development
or acquisition of clean energy resources, acquisition of energy efficiency and  demand re-
sponse, including an acquisition required by ORS 757.054, development of new  transmission
and other supporting  infrastructure, retirement of existing generating facilities, changes in
system operation and any other necessary action.
(6) The commission shall ensure that an electric  company demonstrates continual
progress as described in subsection (4)(e) of this section and  is taking actions as soon as
practicable that  facilitate rapid reduction of greenhouse gas emissions at reasonable costs
to retail electricity consumers.
SECTION 5.
Emissions verification; compliance.  (1)(a) For the purposes of  verifying
emissions and determining compliance with the clean energy targets set  forth in section 3
of this 2021 Act, the Department of Environmental Quality shall determine:
(A) For each electric company, the electric company’s baseline emissions level; and
(B) For each retail electricity provider, the amount of  emissions reduction necessary for
the retail electricity provider to meet the clean  energy targets set forth in section 3 of this
2021 Act.
(b) The  department shall use the method of measuring greenhouse gas emissions set
forth in ORS 468A.280 to verify  the projected greenhouse gas emissions reductions forecasted
in a clean energy plan  of an electric company or the information provided by an electricity
service supplier under subsection (3) of this section.
(c) The department shall report the department’s  findings under paragraph (b) of this
subsection to the Public Utility Commission and the  electric company seeking acknowledge-
ment of a clean energy plan by the commission.
(2) The Public Utility  Commission shall acknowledge the clean energy plan if the com-
mission finds the plan to be in the  public interest and consistent with the clean energy tar-
gets set forth in section 3 of this  2021 Act. In evaluating whether a plan is in the public
interest, the commission shall consider:
(a) Any reduction of  greenhouse gas emissions that is expected through the plan, and any
related environmental or health benefits;
(b) The economic and technical feasibility of the plan;
Enrolled House Bill 2021 (HB 2021-C) Page 3
(c) The effect of the plan on the reliability and resiliency of the electric system;
(d) Availability of federal incentives;
(e) Costs and risks to the customers; and
(f) Any other relevant factors as determined by the commission.
(3) In addition to the emissions report required under subsection  (4) of this section, an
electricity service supplier shall report to the commission:
(a) An estimate of annual greenhouse  gas emissions associated with electricity sold by
the electricity service supplier to retail electricity consumers for the  current year and fol-
lowing three years;
(b) Annual goals set by the electricity service  supplier for actions described under para-
graph (c)(A) of this subsection, including a  projected reduction of annual greenhouse gas
emissions associated with the electricity sold to retail electricity consumers by  the electric-
ity service supplier;
(c) Other information necessary, as determined by the  commission, to demonstrate the
electricity service supplier’s anticipated ability to meet the clean energy targets  set forth in
section 3 of this 2021 Act, including:
(A) Actions to make continual progress toward  meeting the clean energy targets that
are consistent with providing affordable, reliable, and clean electricity service; and
(B) Anticipated actions to facilitate  rapid reductions of greenhouse gas emissions at
reasonable costs to retail electricity consumers served by the electricity service supplier; and
(d) The commission shall review the information supplied by an electricity service  sup-
plier under this subsection for  the purposes of determining whether the electricity service
supplier is making continual and reasonable progress toward compliance with  the clean en-
ergy targets set forth in section 3 of this 2021 Act.
(4)(a) A  retail electricity provider shall report annual greenhouse gas emissions associ-
ated with the electricity sold  to retail electricity consumers by the retail electricity provider
to the Department of Environmental Quality in the manner set forth under  ORS 468A.280,
or rules adopted pursuant thereto.
(b) The Public Utility Commission shall use the greenhouse  gas emissions reported to the
department under paragraph (a) of  this subsection and provided to the commission to de-
termine whether or not the retail electricity provider has met the clean  energy targets set
forth in section 3 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 6.
Utility Community Benefits and Impacts Advisory Group.  (1)  An electric
company that files a clean energy plan under section 4 of this 2021 Act shall convene  a
Community Benefits and Impacts Advisory Group. The  members of the electric company’s
Community Benefits and Impacts Advisory Group  will be determined by the electric company
with input from stakeholders that represent the interests  of customers or affected entities
within the electric company’s service territory. Members  must include representatives of
environmental justice  communities and low-income ratepayers and may include represen-
tatives from other affected entities within the electric company’s service territory.
(2)(a) The electric company shall develop, in consultation with the Community  Benefits
and Impacts Advisory Group, a biennial report that assesses the community benefits and
impacts of the electric company and shall file the biennial report  with the Public Utility
Commission. The biennial report must include a description of the following:
(A) Energy burden and disconnections for residential customers and  disconnections for
small commercial customers;
(B) Opportunities to increase contracting with businesses owned by  women, veterans or
Black, Indigenous, or People of Color;
(C) Actions within  environmental justice communities within the electric company’s
service territory intended to improve resilience during adverse conditions or facilitate in-
vestments in the distribution system, including investments  in facilities that generate non-
emitting electricity;
Enrolled House Bill 2021 (HB 2021-C) Page 4
(D) Distribution of infrastructure or grid investments and upgrades in environmental
justice communities in the electric  company’s service territory, including infrastructure or
grid investments that facilitate the  electric company’s compliance with the clean energy
targets set forth in section 3 of this 2021 Act;
(E) Social, economic or environmental justice  cobenefits that result from the electric
company’s investments, contracts or internal practices;
(F) Customer experience, including a review of annual customer satisfaction surveys;
(G) Actions to encourage customer engagement; and
(H) Other items as determined by the  electric company and the electric company’s
Community Benefits and Impacts Advisory Group.
(b) The electric company may  engage the Community Benefits and Impacts Advisory
Group to advise on other matters, including but not limited to:
(A) The development and equitable implementation of a clean energy plan as  determined
in section 4 of this 2021 Act;
(B) The development and equitable implementation of a distribution system plan;
(C) Equitable contracting practices; and
(D) Best practices and strategies for reducing energy burden and disconnections in  the
electric company’s service territory.
(3) The commission shall establish a  process for an electric company to
contemporaneously recover the cost associated  with the development of biennial reports and
the costs associated with compensation or  reimbursement for time and travel of members
of a Community Benefits and Impacts Advisory Group.
SECTION 7.
Treatment of generation resources; greenhouse gas  emissions accounting.
For the  purposes of determining compliance with sections 1 to 15 of this 2021 Act, electricity
shall have the emission attributes of the underlying generating resource.
SECTION 8. Determining compliance with clean energy  targets. (1)(a) In determining
whether a retail electricity provider has complied with the clean energy  targets set forth in
section 3 of this 2021 Act, the Public Utility Commission shall take into consideration  un-
planned emissions in excess of the amount  projected in an electric company’s clean energy
plan submitted under section 4 of this 2021 Act or  the information provided by an electricity
service supplier under section 5 (3) of this 2021 Act, to the extent:
(A) The emissions are in excess of the clean energy targets set forth in section 3  of this
2021 Act;
(B) Generation of electricity  from nonemitting resources forecasted to meet electricity
demand is less than expected, including variability in the  generation, transmission, con-
straints or other causes; and
(C) The additional  emissions are from the generation of electricity necessary to meet
load.
(b) A retail electricity provider that continues  to be out of compliance with the clean
energy targets  set forth in section 3 of this 2021 Act for more than 12 months as a result
of unplanned emissions as described in paragraph (a)(A) to (C) of this subsection shall in-
clude a detailed plan on how the retail electricity provider will return to  compliance as soon
as practicable, subject to approval by the commission, for  an electric company, in a subse-
quent clean energy plan or,  for an electricity service supplier, in a subsequent submission
to the commission under section 5 (3) of this 2021 Act.
(2) Greenhouse gas emissions associated with electricity acquired from net metering  of
customer resources or a qualifying facility under  the terms of the Public Utility Regulatory
Policies Act shall be excluded from the determination of the retail  electricity provider’s total
greenhouse gas emissions.
(3) For purposes of determining whether a retail electricity provider has complied with
the clean energy targets set forth in section 3 of this 2021 Act, electricity,  other than un-
specified market power, purchased from the Bonneville Power  Administration for delivery
Enrolled House Bill 2021 (HB 2021-C) Page 5
to retail electricity consumers shall be  deemed to have the Bonneville Power Administration
asset controlling  supplier emission factor reported to the Department of Environmental
Quality under ORS 468A.280, or rules adopted pursuant thereto.
(4)(a) For an electric company subject to ORS 469A.052, the  commission shall initiate a
process to update the  avoided costs calculated pursuant to ORS 758.525 for a qualifying fa-
cility under ORS 758.505 to ensure avoided costs accurately reflect  the characteristics of
generators that contribute to compliance with sections 1 to 15 of this 2021 Act.
(b) The process initiated by the commission under paragraph (a) of this subsection may
commence no sooner than two calendar years before the calendar  year identified in the
electric company’s acknowledged integrated resource  plan that shows the electric company
will meet or exceed the  requirements described in ORS 469A.052 (1)(h) and must conclude
no later than the calendar year identified in the acknowledged integrated  resource plan that
shows the electric company will meet or exceed the requirements described  in ORS 469A.052
(1)(h).
SECTION 9. Reliability pause. (1) Upon its own motion or at the request  of an electric
company, the Public Utility Commission may open  an investigation pursuant to ORS 756.515
(1) to determine whether to grant a temporary  exemption to an electric company’s compli-
ance with one or more of the requirements of ORS 469A.052 or  a clean energy plan adopted
pursuant to sections 1 to 15 of this 2021 Act.
(2) The commission may grant a temporary exemption if compliance:
(a) Conflicts with or compromises an electric  company’s obligation to comply with man-
datory reliability standards set by the North American Electric Reliability Corporation;
(b) Violates or significantly  impairs a resource adequacy requirement or recommendation
of a multistate, regional or national entity;
(c) Violates or significantly impairs an electric company’s ability to comply  with a Bal-
ancing Authority Area declaration of an energy emergency alert under categories 1 through
3, as designated by the North American Electric  Reliability Corporation, or successor cate-
gories adopted after the effective date of this 2021 Act;
(d) Results, regardless  of best efforts to secure cost-effective nonemitting energy re-
sources or funding for energy efficiency and conservation, in the provision of service at other
than fair and reasonable rates; or
(e) Otherwise compromises the power quality  or integrity of an electric company’s sys-
tem.
(3) An electric company making a request under this section shall  submit to the com-
mission an application that includes:
(a) An explanation of how compliance results in one or more of  the issues described un-
der subsection (2) of this section;
(b) A description of how a temporary exemption from compliance with  one or more of
the requirements of ORS 469A.052 or a clean energy plan adopted pursuant to sections 1 to
15 of  this 2021 Act will avoid the issues identified under paragraph (a) of this subsection; and
(c) A plan to achieve full compliance  with the requirements of ORS 469A.052 or a clean
energy plan adopted pursuant  to sections 1 to 15 of this 2021 Act, including an estimate of
the time needed to achieve full compliance.
(4) In applying for a temporary exemption under  this section, an electric company has
the burden of  demonstrating that the company’s compliance will likely result in one or more
of the issues described under subsection (2) of this section.
(5) If, after investigation, the commission determines  that compliance with one or more
of the requirements  of ORS 469A.052 or a clean energy plan adopted pursuant to sections 1
to 15 of this 2021 Act will, more likely than not, result in one or more  of the issues described
under subsection (2) of this section, the commission shall:
(a) Issue an order exempting the electric company from one  or more of the requirements
of ORS 469A.052 or a clean energy plan adopted pursuant to sections 1 to 15  of this 2021 Act
Enrolled House Bill 2021 (HB 2021-C) Page 6
for a length  of time sufficient to allow the electric company to achieve full compliance in a
manner that does not result  in one or more of the issues described under subsection (2) of
this section.
(b) Direct the electric company to take  specific actions to remedy the potential issue or
issues identified in the order.
(c) Direct the electric company to  file within six months from the date the order is is-
sued, or within a length of time determined by the commission to  be reasonable, a report
on the company’s progress toward  achieving full compliance with the requirements of ORS
469A.052 or a clean energy plan adopted pursuant to sections 1 to 15 of this 2021 Act.
(6) An  order issued under subsection (5) of this section may not impose a penalty but
may require the use of alternative compliance  rates or payments, if applicable, as provided
in ORS 469A.180 during the period of time a temporary exemption is in effect.
(7) An electric company may request  an extension of a temporary exemption granted
under this  section. The electric company shall include in the company’s request for an ex-
tension the same information required under subsection (3)  of this section and shall have the
burden of proof described under subsection (4) of this section.
(8) The commission shall provide the same opportunity to  an electricity service supplier
as provided an electric company under this  section to receive a temporary exemption from
compliance with one or more of  the requirements of ORS 469A.052 or 469A.065 or sections 1
to 15 of this 2021 Act, or extension  of such a temporary exemption, based on comparable
procedures and  criteria, to the extent the procedures and criteria under this section apply
to an electricity service supplier as applied to an electric company under this section.
(9) The commission may grant an electric company or electricity service supplier a
temporary exemption that is comparable to a temporary  exemption granted to another
electric company or electricity service supplier without  conducting a separate investigation
under subsection (1) of this section, if the commission determines that the  conditions that
resulted in the granted temporary exemption holds for the electric company or electricity
service supplier.
(10) Nothing in this section  is intended to permanently relieve an electric company or
electricity service supplier of the obligation to comply with the requirements of ORS 469A.052
or 469A.065 or sections 1 to 15 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 10.
Cost cap for electric companies.  (1) An electric company or  an organization
that represents broad customer interests and that has a written agreement with an  electric
company pursuant to ORS 757.072  may request that the Public Utility Commission open an
investigation to  provide accounting for investments made, costs incurred or forecasted costs
estimated by the electric company for the purpose of compliance with sections 1 to  15 of this
2021 Act. In  making a request under this section, the petitioner shall provide information
regarding the investments or costs sufficient to determine whether the investments or costs
contribute to compliance with sections 1 to 15 of this 2021 Act.
(2)(a) The commission shall provide parties to the  proceeding with the procedural rights
described in ORS 756.500 to 756.610, including the opportunity to develop an evidentiary  re-
cord, conduct discovery, introduce  evidence, conduct cross-examination and submit written
briefs and oral arguments.
(b) The petitioner shall have the burden of showing, by a preponderance of the  evidence,
that the investment or cost contributes to compliance with sections 1 to  15 of this 2021 Act.
(c) The commission shall issue a written order  with findings on the evidentiary record
development in the proceeding.
(d) Except as provided under ORS 756.610, a determination by the commission  that an
investment or cost contributes to compliance with sections 1 to 15  of this 2021 Act is final
and may not be reexamined.
(3) Upon determining that  an investment or cost of an electric company contributes to
compliance with sections 1 to 15 of this 2021 Act, the  commission shall determine the actual
Enrolled House Bill 2021 (HB 2021-C) Page 7
or anticipated rate impact for the investment or cost on the same basis and with  the same
treatment for similarly situated investments or costs in the most recently approved general
rate case or other relevant rate making proceeding. The commission shall use the  actual or
anticipated rate impact of each  investment or cost to calculate the cumulative rate impact
and shall:
(a) Cumulatively calculate  the rate impact caused by all investments or costs that have
been the subject of  a proceeding pursuant to this section, and must be included in calculation
for the time period that the investment or  cost would affect rates, as adjusted by any change
in net costs expected or foreseeable at the time of inclusion;
(b) Make any adjustments to the cumulative rate impact if the initial  rate treatment was
calculated on the basis of forecasted rate impact;
(c) Allow parties to the proceeding  to propose alternative rate or accounting treatment
of the investment or cost to limit the potential rate impact of the investment or cost; and
(d) Utilize cost allocation methodologies for  attributing rate impacts of investments or
costs for multistate electric companies.
(4) Upon a determination that  the actual or anticipated cumulative rate impact calcu-
lated under subsection (3) of this section exceeds six percent of the annual revenue require-
ment for a year, the commission shall provide an exemption from further compliance with
the requirements of sections 1 to 15 of this 2021 Act. An exemption must be:
(a) Narrowly  tailored to otherwise give full force and effect to the requirements of
sections 1 to 15 of this 2021 Act that can be complied with without  regard to the cumulative
rate impact; and
(b) Limited in duration to only such time as is necessary  to allow for additional invest-
ments and actual or forecasted costs to be made or incurred without exceeding the cumula-
tive rate impact.
(5) A determination by the commission made  under this section shall have no effect on
and may not be used as collateral or presumptive  evidence in any other proceeding that de-
termines rate recovery of the investment or cost, including in  a general rate case or in a
proceeding under ORS 469A.120.
(6) The commission may, on its own motion  pursuant to ORS 756.515, open a proceeding
under this section and direct an electric company to make a filing described under subsection
(1) of this section.
SECTION 11.
Cost cap for electricity service suppliers.  The Public Utility Commission
shall provide the same opportunity to an electricity service supplier as  provided an electric
company under section 10 of  this 2021 Act to receive a comparable exemption from further
compliance with the requirements of sections 1 to  15 of this 2021 Act. A comparable ex-
emption shall be provided based on comparable  procedures and criteria, to the extent the
procedures and criteria apply to an electricity service  supplier as applied to an electric
company under section 10 of  this 2021 Act and adjusted to reflect applicable differences be-
tween electricity service suppliers and electric companies.
SECTION 12. Early compliance; incentive.  In furtherance of  the clean energy targets set
forth in section 3 of this 2021 Act, the  Public Utility Commission may apply a performance
incentive for early compliance with one or more of the clean energy targets.
SECTION 13. No modification to Renewable Portfolio  Standards. The requirements of
sections 1 to 15 of this 2021 Act do not replace  or modify the requirements of ORS 469A.005
to 469A.210.
SECTION 14. Rules. (1) The Public Utility Commission  may adopt rules as necessary to
implement sections 1 to 15 of this 2021 Act.
(2) The commission shall review and identify costs incurred by electric companies for
obligations not similarly imposed on electricity service  suppliers to comply with sections 1
to 15 of this 2021 Act that retail electric  consumers served by electricity service suppliers
may avoid by obtaining electric power through direct access and ensure that  the identified
Enrolled House Bill 2021 (HB 2021-C) Page 8
costs are recovered  from all retail electricity consumers, are calculated and recovered on the
basis of electricity consumption and  bear a direct relationship to costs borne by retail elec-
tricity consumers served by electric companies.
SECTION 15. Electricity market participation.  (1)(a) The Legislative Assembly finds  that
existing and future  electricity markets will play a critical role in the transformation of the
electric sector to nonemitting sources, as well  as enabling load serving entities to reduce
costs and serve load reliably by accessing resource and load diversity.
(b) The Legislative Assembly further finds that accounting and compliance frameworks
designed to further the State of Oregon’s policy objectives should  support and be consistent
with efforts  to enhance the access to and scope of existing and potential future electricity
markets.
(c) Acknowledging the inherently  regional and multistate nature of electricity markets,
the State of Oregon should coordinate and collaborate with  other states to achieve the goal
of aligning accounting methodologies where  possible while also ensuring market rules do not
undermine state policy objectives.
(d) Over time, the evolution of regional wholesale electricity markets may necessitate the
modification of existing accounting and compliance rules to ensure the  benefit of market
participation are preserved.
(2) The Department of  Environmental Quality may periodically review and update its
calculation under ORS 468A.280 of the  greenhouse gas emissions rates assigned to unspeci-
fied power purchases and  purchases of power dispatched by centralized market operators to
reflect the current resource mix and associated emissions of  such purchases. The depart-
ment shall ensure that the calculation of emissions rates under this section takes  into ac-
count the potential  for the energy imbalance market and other centralized market
operations across a wide geographic area to  increase the availability of nonemitting re-
sources to serve load in the state.
SECTION 16. ORS 469A.062 is repealed.
SECTION 17. Sections 1 to 15 of this 2021 Act do  not apply to an electric company, as
defined in ORS 757.600, that serves electricity to 25,000 or fewer retail electricity consumers,
as defined in ORS 757.600, located in this state.
STUDY ON SMALL SCALE RENEWABLE ENERGY PROJECTS
SECTION 18. (1) The State Department of Energy  shall convene a work group to examine
opportunities to encourage development of small scale and community-based renewable  en-
ergy projects in  this state that contribute to economic development and local energy
resiliency. The work group shall include:
(a) One state representative appointed by the Speaker of the House;
(b) One senator appointed by the President of the Senate; and
(c) Individuals who represent:
(A) Renewable energy developers;
(B) Investor-owned electric utilities in this state;
(C) Consumer-owned utilities in this state;
(D) Electricity service suppliers;
(E) Residential, commercial and industrial rate payers;
(F) Cities and counties;
(G) Tribal governments;
(H) Business Oregon;
(I) The Department of Land Conservation and Development;
(J) The renewable energy workforce;
(K) Environmental justice communities;
(L) The Public Utility Commission;
Enrolled House Bill 2021 (HB 2021-C) Page 9
(M) The Public Purpose Fund Administrator described in ORS 470.555; and
(N) The Bonneville Power Administration.
(2) The work group shall study and examine:
(a) Potential barriers to project development in both  investor-owned and consumer-
owned utility service territory, including land use, local and state utility regulations, trans-
mission capacity, contracts or obligations under the Public Utility Regulatory Policies Act
of 1978 (16 U.S.C. 2601 et seq.), implementation and costs or financing;
(b) Potential economic benefits of small-scale renewable energy projects;
(c) Potential  contributions of small-scale renewable energy projects to local energy
resiliency;
(d) Access and ownership opportunities  for low-income communities, Black, Indigenous
and People of Color communities, tribal communities and rural and coastal communities with
limited infrastructure;
(e) Opportunities for diverse models of ownership by local  governments, nonprofit or-
ganizations and cooperatives of community members;
(f) Potential rate impacts; and
(g) Potential legislation that could encourage development of small  scale and
community-based renewable energy projects in this state.
(3) Members of the work group shall comply with requests from  the State Department
of Energy for data related to the work group’s study and work under this section.
(4) The State Department of Energy shall submit a  report describing the current status
and trends for small scale and community-based renewable energy  development in this state
based on the findings made under subsection (2) of this section  and may include recommen-
dations to an interim committee of the Legislative Assembly related  to energy no later than
September 30, 2022.
SECTION 19.
Section 18 of this 2021 Act is repealed on December 15, 2022.
CUSTOMER SUPPORTED RENEWABLES
SECTION 20.  ORS 757.603 is amended to read:
757.603. [(1)(a)] (1) Except as provided in this [ subsection] section , an electric company shall
provide all retail electricity consumers that  are connected to the electric company’s distribution
system with a regulated, cost-of-service rate option.
[(b)] (2)(a) The Public Utility Commission by order may waive the requirement [ of paragraph (a)
of this subsection ] in subsection (1) of this section  for any retail electricity  consumer other than
residential electricity consumers and small commercial electricity consumers.
(b) [ Before ] Prior to  ordering a waiver  under this [ paragraph] subsection , the commission
[shall] may conduct such studies as the commission deems necessary and shall provide notice  and
opportunity for public comment and hearings  regarding the proposed waiver .
(c) The commission may order a waiver  under this [ paragraph] subsection  if the commission
finds, based on [ an] the evidentiary record developed through the conducted studies,  public com-
ment and hearings, that a market exists in which retail electricity consumers subject to  the waiver
are able to:
(A) Purchase supplies of  electricity adequate to meet the needs of the retail electricity con-
sumers;
(B) Obtain multiple offers for electricity supplies within a reasonable period of time;
(C) Obtain reliable supplies of electricity; and
(D) Purchase electricity at prices that are not unduly volatile  and that are just and reasonable.
[(2)] (3) Each electric company shall provide each [ residential] retail electricity consumer that
is connected to its distribution system and whose electricity demand at any point of delivery  is
less than 30  kilowatts a portfolio of rate options. The portfolio of rate options  shall include at
least the following options:
Enrolled House Bill 2021 (HB 2021-C) Page 10
(a) A rate that reflects significant new renewable energy resources;
(b) A market-based rate; and
(c) If the commission finds, through public comment and hearing or through market  research
conducted  by  the electric company, that demand is sufficient to justify the rate, a rate option for
electricity associated with a specific renewable energy resource,  including solar photovoltaic en-
ergy.
[(3)(a)] (4) The commission shall regulate  the cost-of-service rate option under subsection (1) of
this section and the portfolio of rate options under [ subsection (2) of ] this section. The commission :
(a) Shall reasonably ensure that the costs , [ and] risks  and benefits  of serving each option are
reflected in the rates for each option , and such rates may include a monthly flat  rate or charge
in addition to usage .
(b) [ The commission ] May prohibit or otherwise limit the use of a cost-of-service  rate by retail
electricity consumers who have been served through direct access[ , and].
(c) May limit switching among  the  portfolio of rate  options and  the cost-of-service rate [ by
residential electricity consumers ].
(5)(a) As used in this subsection, “government” means a city, county, irrigation  district,
ditch improvement  district, water control district, or government of a federally recognized
Indian tribe in Oregon.
(b) An electric company may file, as part of a portfolio of rate options required under this
section and if agreed to in coordination with one or more governments to meet adopted
renewable and nonemitting energy goals, a program  of rates or charges that reflect the cost
of an electric company program to serve retail electricity consumers within the boundaries
of those governments with electricity:
(A) Derived from new or existing renewable energy  resources or nonemitting energy re-
sources, including supply and demand-side resources; or
(B) Paired with unbundled renewable  energy certificates, as defined in ORS 469A.005,
from new or existing renewable energy resources.
(c) The commission may approve a rate or charge under this subsection if:
(A) The government attests that the coordination required  under paragraph (b) of this
subsection occurred and the electric company includes the attestation in the filing for  a
program of rates or charges;
(B) The government  enacts or adopts an ordinance, charter provision, resolution or other
regulation requiring that retail electricity consumers  within the boundaries of the govern-
ment must, as determined during the coordination required by paragraph (b) of this sub-
section and conducted in  accordance with this paragraph, be served with renewable energy
resources or nonemitting energy resources,  including at the option of the government, re-
sources such as:
(i) Energy from  community-based resources, including solar photovoltaic, storage,
microgrids, irrigation district-owned projects, in-pipe hydroelectric, or  micro-hydroelectric,
that provide community cobenefits, such as:
(I) Community stability;
(II) Community reinvestment;
(III) Ownership by a nonprofit organization or renewable energy cooperative  that re-
presents an environmental justice community;
(IV) Ownership by the government;
(V) Disaster resiliency;
(VI) Water savings;
(VII) Species protection;
(VIII) Direct cost savings to customers; or
(IX) Local economic development and jobs; and
(ii) Renewable and nonemitting  energy resources acquired through government specified
procurement criteria which may include goals for local or diverse ownership;
Enrolled House Bill 2021 (HB 2021-C) Page 11
(C) The ordinance, charter provision, resolution or other regulation specifies that:
(i) All eligible retail electricity consumers served within the boundaries of the govern-
ment are placed on the rate schedule by  the electric company, upon commission approval,
but have an opportunity to decline to be served by the rate option; and
(ii) Retail electricity consumers within the boundaries of the government that  are con-
nected to the distribution system and whose electricity  demand at any point of delivery is
greater than 30  kilowatts may choose to be placed on the rate schedule, if the electric com-
pany determines that electricity demand at the consumer’s point of delivery  is greater than
30 kilowatts because of additional demand resulting from electrification of transportation or
other services, including electric  vehicle charging stations, after the effective date of this
2021 Act;
(D) The ordinance, charter provision, resolution or other regulation includes protections,
such as subsidies or bill payment assistance,  for low-income retail electricity consumers af-
fected by the rates or charges and  provides that these protections are paid for solely by re-
tail electricity consumers within the boundaries of the government;
(E) The electric company has included in the  program provisions to minimize the shifting
of costs from retail electricity consumers to other customers who do not participate;
(F) The ordinance, charter provision, resolution or other  regulation sets forth the dura-
tion of the program; and
(G) The electric company  utilizes commission-approved procurement processes, to the
extent those  processes apply, and the procurement criteria agreed to with the government
in subparagraph (B)(ii) of this paragraph.
(d) After the electric company receives  approval to serve retail electricity consumers
within the boundaries of the government according to  the program of rates or charges
adopted pursuant to this subsection, the electric company must:
(A) Prior to commencing the program, receive acknowledgement from  the government
to proceed with the program as  approved by the commission and, if the government declines
to proceed, shall file to suspend the rates and charges under the program;
(B) Include information on its monthly  bills to participating retail electricity consumers
identifying the program’s cost;
(C) Provide notice to participating  retail electricity consumers of any change in rate for
participation in the program; and
(D) Provide an annual report to the commission and participating governments summa-
rizing the program activities in the prior calendar year.
(e) The commission shall allow the electric company, for  purposes of the new or existing
renewable energy resources or nonemitting energy resources that serve the program of rates
or charges adopted pursuant to this subsection:
(A) To own the facilities or use power purchase agreements.
(B) To recover part or  all of the costs associated with the resources that serve the pro-
gram, including costs associated with resources described in subparagraph (A) of this para-
graph, from all retail electricity consumers not served by an electricity service supplier, if:
(i) The electric  company can demonstrate that above-market or incremental costs of
those resources have been paid for by program participants;
(ii) An integrated resource plan conducted by  the electric company shows an energy or
capacity need and the company demonstrates that such resources are capable  of meeting
that need, in whole or in part;
(iii) The electric company  will use the resources to meet a renewable portfolio standard
imposed by ORS 469A.052;
(iv) The resources help the electric company comply with section 3 of this 2021 Act; or
(v) All customers will  otherwise benefit from inclusion of the costs in rates collected
from all customers.
Enrolled House Bill 2021 (HB 2021-C) Page 12
(C) To collect moneys from participating retail electricity consumers in  excess of the
cost of service and defer  revenues or costs associated with the program for the purposes of
making future investments  in resources or renewable energy certificates to serve program
participants and for  the purposes of protecting nonparticipating retail electricity consumers
should the government end its participation in the program.
(D) To recover the costs associated with the resources that serve the program, including
costs associated with resources described in subparagraph (A) of this  paragraph, from retail
electricity consumers within the boundaries of the government other than those served  by
electricity service suppliers, if the government ends  its participation in the program and the
costs are not otherwise recoverable under subparagraph (B) of this paragraph.
(6) Nothing in subsection  (3) of this section prohibits an electric company from providing
retail electricity consumers that are connected to its  distribution system and whose elec-
tricity demand at any point of delivery is greater than 30 kilowatts a portfolio of  rate
options.
(7) Notwithstanding the exemption to ORS 757.600 to 757.691 provided by ORS  757.601 (3),
an electric company serving fewer than 25,000  customers in this state may propose a pro-
gram for approval by the commission if the program meets the criteria specified  in this
section.
SECTION 21.  ORS 469A.205 is amended to read:
469A.205. (1)  Electric utilities shall allow retail electricity consumers to elect a green power
rate. A significant portion of the electricity purchased or generated by a utility that  is attributable
to moneys paid by retail electricity consumers who elect the  green power rate must be qualifying
electricity, and the utility must inform consumers of the sources of the electricity purchased or
generated by the utility that is attributable to moneys paid  by consumers who elect the green power
rate. The green power rate shall reasonably  reflect the costs of the electricity purchased or gener-
ated by the utility that is attributable to moneys paid by retail electricity consumers who elect  the
green power rate. All prudently incurred  costs associated with the green power rate are recoverable
in a green power rate offered by an electric company.
(2) Any qualifying electricity procured by an electric utility to provide electricity under a  green
power rate under subsection  (1) of this section or ORS 757.603 [ (2)(a)] (3)(a) may not be used by the
utility to comply with the requirements of a renewable portfolio standard.
(3) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section do not apply to electric  companies that are
subject to ORS 757.603 [ (2)(a)] (3)(a).
(4) An electric utility may comply with the requirements  of subsection (1) of this section by
contracting with a third-party provider.
SECTION 22.
 ORS 757.247 is amended to read:
757.247. (1) The Public Utility Commission may authorize a public utility, upon application of the
utility, to file and place into effect a  tariff schedule establishing rates or charges for the cost of
energy resource measures provided to an individual property owner or customer pursuant to an
agreement entered  into between the individual property owner or customer and the public utility.
Energy resource measures provided under this section may include:
(a) The installation of renewable energy generation facilities  on the property of property owners
or the premises of customers;
(b) The implementation of energy conservation measures, including  measures that are not cost-
effective;
(c) The  installation of equipment or devices or the implementation of measures that enable de-
mand reduction, peak load reduction, improved integration of renewable energy generation or more
effective utilization of energy resources;
(d) Loans for the purposes described in paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subsection; and
(e) Direct payments to third parties for the  purposes described in paragraphs (a) to (c) of this
subsection.
Enrolled House Bill 2021 (HB 2021-C) Page 13
(2) Subject to the agreement entered into between the individual  property owner or customer
and the public utility, a  tariff schedule placed into effect under this section may include provisions
for:
(a) The payment of the rates or charges over a period of time;
(b) Except as provided in subsection (5)  of this section, a reasonable rate of return on any in-
vestment made by the public utility;
(c) The application of any payment obligation to successive owners of the property to which the
energy resource  measure is attached or to successive customers located at the premises to which
the energy resource measure is attached; and
(d) The application of the payment obligation to the current property owner or customer  alone,
secured by methods agreed to by the property owner or customer and the public utility.
(3) Application of a tariff schedule under this section is subject to approval by the commission.
(4) If a payment obligation applies to successive property owners or customers as described in
subsection (2)(c) of this section, a public utility shall  record a notice of the payment obligation in
the records maintained by the county clerk under ORS 205.130. The  commission may prescribe by
rule other methods by which the public utility shall  notify property owners or customers of such
payment obligations.
(5) A public utility may  use moneys obtained through a rate established under ORS 757.603
[(2)(a)] (3)(a)  to provide a renewable energy generation facility to a property owner or  customer
under this section. A public utility may not charge interest to a property owner  or customer for a
renewable energy generation facility acquired with moneys obtained  through a rate established un-
der ORS 757.603 [ (2)(a)] (3)(a).
(6) Agreements entered into and tariff schedules placed  into effect under this section are not
subject to ORS 470.500 to 470.710, 757.612 or 757.689.
SECTION 23.
 ORS 757.646 is amended to read:
757.646. (1) The duties, functions and powers of the Public  Utility Commission shall include de-
veloping policies to eliminate barriers  to the development of a competitive retail market [ structure]
between electricity service suppliers and electric companies . The policies  shall be designed to
mitigate the vertical and horizontal market power of incumbent electric  companies[ ,] and prohibit
preferential treatment, or  the appearance of such treatment, [ of] by the incumbent electric com-
panies toward  generation or market affiliates [ and determine the electricity services likely to be
competitive]. The commission may require an electric company acting as an electricity service  sup-
plier do so through an affiliate.
(2) The  commission shall establish by rule a code of conduct for electric companies and their
affiliates to protect against market abuses and anticompetitive practices. The code shall,  at a mini-
mum:
(a) Require an electric  company and any affiliate that shares the same name and logo to disclose
to all consumers the relationship between the company and affiliate and to clarify that the  affiliate
is not the same as the electric company and that in order to receive service  from the company a
consumer does not have to purchase the services of the affiliate;
(b) Prohibit preferential access by an electric company affiliate to confidential consumer infor-
mation;
(c) [ Prohibit] Minimize cross-subsidization between competitive operations  and regulated oper-
ations, including the use of electric company personnel and other resources;
(d) Prohibit joint marketing activities and exclusive referral arrangements  between an electric
company and its affiliates;
(e) Provide the commission with all necessary access to books and records;
(f) Require electric companies to make regular compliance filings; and
(g) Require fair treatment of all competitors by a distribution utility.
(3) An electric company  shall provide the commission access to all books and records necessary
for the commission to  monitor the electric company and its affiliate relationships. The commission
Enrolled House Bill 2021 (HB 2021-C) Page 14
shall require an electric  company biannually to file a report detailing compliance with this sub-
section.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this  section, the commission shall ensure that pol-
icies developed to mitigate the vertical and horizontal  market power of incumbent electric
companies do not limit or  delay electric companies from offering programs or services or
making prudent investments in  furtherance of the clean energy targets established by sec-
tion 3 of this 2021 Act or a program established under ORS 757.603  (5), or that otherwise aid
in reducing statewide emissions of greenhouse gases  consistent with state policies, including
ORS 283.398 and 468A.205.
SECTION 24.  ORS 469A.005 is amended to read:
469A.005. As used in ORS 469A.005 to 469A.210:
(1) “Acquires  service territory” does not include an acquisition by a city of a facility, plant,
equipment or service territory within the boundaries of the city, pursuant to ORS 225.020  or city
charter, if the city:
(a) Already owns, controls or operates an electric light and  power system for supplying elec-
tricity to the inhabitants of the city and for general municipal purposes;
(b) Provides fair, just and reasonable compensation to the electric company  whose service ter-
ritory is acquired that:
(A) Gives consideration for the service territory rights and the cost of the  facility, plant or
equipment acquired and for depreciation, fair market value, reproduction cost and any other rele-
vant factor; and
(B) Is based on the present value of the service territory rights  and the facility, plant and
equipment acquired, including the value of poles, wires, transformers  and similar and related appli-
ances necessarily required to provide electric service; and
(c) Pays any stranded costs obligation established pursuant to ORS 757.483.
(2) “Banked renewable energy certificate”  means a bundled or unbundled renewable energy
certificate that is not used by an electric utility or electricity service supplier to comply with a
renewable portfolio standard in a calendar  year, and that is carried forward for the purpose of
compliance with a renewable portfolio standard in a subsequent year.
(3) “BPA electricity”  means electricity provided by the Bonneville Power Administration, in-
cluding electricity generated by the Federal Columbia River Power System  hydroelectric projects
and electricity acquired by the Bonneville Power Administration by contract.
(4) “Bundled renewable energy  certificate” means a renewable energy certificate for qualifying
electricity that is acquired:
(a) By an electric utility or electricity service supplier by a trade, purchase  or other transfer
of electricity that includes the renewable energy certificate that was issued for the electricity; [ or]
(b) By an electric utility by generation of the electricity for which the renewable energy cer-
tificate was issued ; or
(c) By an electricity service supplier by retirement by an electric  company where the
renewable energy certificate satisfied  paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection prior to such
retirement and was retired on behalf of the electricity service supplier on behalf of a  retail
electricity consumer that pays transition adjustments to the electric company .
(5) “Compliance year” means the calendar year  for which the electric utility or electricity ser-
vice supplier seeks to establish compliance with the renewable  portfolio standard applicable to the
electric utility or electricity service supplier in the compliance report  submitted under ORS
469A.170.
(6) “Consumer-owned utility” means a municipal electric  utility, a people’s utility district or-
ganized under ORS chapter 261 that sells electricity  or an electric cooperative organized under ORS
chapter 62.
(7) “Distribution utility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
(8) “Electric company” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
(9) “Electric utility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
Enrolled House Bill 2021 (HB 2021-C) Page 15
(10) “Electricity service supplier” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
(11) “Qualifying electricity” means electricity described in ORS 469A.010.
(12) “Renewable energy source” means a source of electricity described in ORS 469A.025.
(13) “Retail  electricity consumer” means a retail electricity consumer, as defined in ORS
757.600, that is located in Oregon.
(14) “Unbundled renewable energy certificate” means :
(a) A renewable energy certificate for qualifying electricity that is acquired  by an electric
utility or electricity service supplier by  trade, purchase or other transfer without acquiring the
electricity that is associated with the renewable energy certificate ; or
(b) A renewable energy certificate that is  sold to a retail electricity consumer without
selling, on a  non-cost-of-service basis, the electricity associated with the renewable energy
certificate to the retail electricity consumer .
PROVIDING INFORMATION ABOUT CLEAN ENERGY PROGRAMS
TO CUSTOMERS AND THE PUBLIC
SECTION 25.
 ORS 757.649 is amended to read:
757.649. (1)(a) A person or other entity shall not act as an electricity service supplier  unless the
person or  entity is certified by the Public Utility Commission. The commission, by rule, shall es-
tablish standards for certification of persons or  other entities as electricity service suppliers in this
state. The rules shall, at a minimum, address:
(A) The ability of the  person or entity to meet the person’s or entity’s obligation to provide
electricity services pursuant to direct access; and
(B) The ability of the person or entity to comply with applicable consumer protection laws.
(b) The commission may require an electricity service supplier to provide a bond or other se-
curity.
(c) The commission may establish a fee, not to exceed $500, for  initial certification and annual
recertification of electricity service suppliers.
(d) The commission, at any time, may revoke an  electricity service supplier’s certification for
failure to comply with applicable statutes and rules.
(e) The commission may require  an electricity service supplier to provide information necessary
to ensure compliance with ORS 757.612. The commission shall ensure the privacy of  all information
and the protection of any proprietary information provided.
(f) The commission shall require an electricity service supplier  to publicly disclose a
summary of the aggregated energy supply  mix and associated emissions of the power sources
that serve the direct access retail electricity consumers of the  electricity service supplier,
or such other  aggregated information comparable to information provided by electric com-
panies to retail electricity consumers as the commission may require.
(2) Every electric utility  shall maintain the integrity of its transmission facilities and distrib-
ution system and provide safe, reliable service to all retail  electricity consumers. Nothing in ORS
757.600 to 757.667 or 757.669 to 757.687 shall reduce or  diminish the statutory or contractual obli-
gations of electric utilities  to maintain the safety and reliability of their transmission facilities and
distribution system and other infrastructure and equipment used to deliver electricity.
(3) The commission for electric companies,  or the governing body for other electric utilities,
shall adopt rules, ordinances, policies and service quality  standards designed to maintain a reliable,
safe and efficient distribution system. The commission  shall regulate electrical safety regarding
generation, transmission, substation and distribution  facilities for electric utilities and other elec-
trical system owners and operators as provided under ORS 757.035.
(4) Every bill to a direct access retail electricity consumer  from an electricity service supplier
shall contain at least:
Enrolled House Bill 2021 (HB 2021-C) Page 16
(a) The rate and amount due for each service or product that the retail electricity  consumer is
purchasing and other price information necessary to facilitate direct access,  as determined by the
commission;
(b) The rates and amounts of state and local taxes or fees, if any, imposed on the  retail elec-
tricity  consumer;
(c) The amount of any public purpose charge or credit;
(d) The amount of any transition charge or transition credit; and
(e) Power source and environmental impact information necessary to ensure that all  consumers
have useful, reliable  and necessary information to exercise informed choice, as determined by the
commission.
(5)(a) A retail electricity consumer of an electric company shall  receive, upon request, a sepa-
rate bill from every individual  electricity service supplier that provides products or services to the
retail electricity consumer. If a retail electricity consumer of an electric company does not  request
separate bills, or a consolidated bill from an electricity service supplier as provided in paragraph
(c) of this subsection, the electric company shall consolidate the bills for all electricity  services into
a single statement,  and electricity service suppliers shall provide to the electric company the in-
formation necessary to prepare a consolidated statement.
(b) The requirement for bill consolidation by an electric company shall continue through De-
cember 31, 2001, after which  time the commission may waive the requirement if the waiver results
in effective billing procedures for retail electricity consumers.
(c) Upon the request of a  retail electricity consumer of an electric company, an electricity ser-
vice supplier shall consolidate the bills for all  electricity services into a single statement, and
electric utilities and other electricity service suppliers shall  provide to the billing electricity service
supplier any information necessary to prepare a consolidated statement.
(d) For retail electricity consumers of an electric company, the  commission shall adopt by rule
provisions relating to the failure of a consumer to  make full payment on a consolidated bill. The
rules shall address  collection of payments, service disconnection and reconnection, and the allo-
cation of costs  associated with collection, disconnection and reconnection. A distribution utility
shall be solely responsible for actual disconnection and reconnection.
RESPONSIBLE CONTRACTOR LABOR STANDARDS
SECTION 26.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Apprentice” and “apprenticeable occupation” have the meanings given those  terms
in ORS 660.010.
(b) “Apprenticeship training program” means the total system of apprenticeship  that a
particular local joint committee, as defined in ORS 660.010, operates, including the local joint
committee’s registered standards and all other terms and conditions for  qualifying, recruit-
ing, selecting, employing and training apprentices in an apprenticeable occupation.
(c) “Construction” includes on-site and off-site construction and fabrication  and covers
30 days after project completion.
(d) “Large-scale project” means a renewable energy  generation, sequestration or storage
facility with a capacity rating of 10 megawatts or greater.
(e) “Minority individual” and “woman” have the  meanings given those terms in ORS
200.005.
(f) “Repower” means replacement of enough of the original generation equipment or
components to make an original energy generation facility equivalent to a new  facility, such
that at least 80 percent  of the fair market value of the facility derives from new generation
equipment or components installed as part of the replacement project.
(g) “Veteran” has the meaning given that term in ORS 408.225.
(2) A person who constructs or repowers a large-scale  project sited in this state shall,
at the time of contract  finalization for development of the project or execution of a contract
Enrolled House Bill 2021 (HB 2021-C) Page 17
for delivery of energy from the project,  provide a signed attestation or declaration stating
to the best of their knowledge and belief, subject to penalty of perjury as  described in ORS
162.065, that during all periods of construction  all contractors and subcontractors working
on the construction or repowering project will:
(a) Participate in an apprenticeship  program registered with the State Apprenticeship
and Training Council and with graduation rates equal to or higher than the national average
for each respective trade in a manner consistent with  the respective apprenticeship training
programs, such that 15 percent of the total work hours  on a given large-scale project is
performed by workers in apprenticeable occupations;
(b) Establish and execute a plan for outreach, recruitment and retention of  women, mi-
nority individuals, veterans and people with disabilities to perform work under the  contract,
with the aspirational target of having at least 15 percent of total work  hours performed by
individuals in one or more of those groups;
(c) Have policies in place that are designed to limit  or prevent workplace harassment and
discrimination and  that promote workplace diversity, equity and inclusion for communities
who have been underrepresented in the clean  energy sector, including women, veterans and
Black, Indigenous and People of Color;
(d) Demonstrate good faith with meeting the requirements described in  paragraphs (a)
to (c) of this subsection by providing documented and verifiable information including:
(A) Internet addresses of employment advertisements or job announcements;
(B) Dates, times, Internet addresses and attendance  lists of a prejob conference with
apprenticeship, preapprenticeship and workforce providers in construction;
(C) Contacts requesting workers with an apprenticeship  program approved by the Bureau
of Labor and Industries including the date, time, telephone contact, email  contact and
whether a response was provided within 48 hours of the request; and
(D) Contacts requesting workers from a union hall including the date,  time, telephone
contact, email contact and whether a response was provided within 48 hours of the request;
(e) Maintain a license and good standing to perform the work and remain eligible  to re-
ceive a contract or subcontract for public works under ORS 279C.860;
(f) Materially demonstrate a history of material compliance in the  previous seven years,
or provide available history for new businesses, with the  rules and other requirements of
state agencies with oversight regarding workers’ compensation, building codes and occupa-
tional safety and health;
(g) Materially demonstrate a history of compliance, in the previous  seven years, or pro-
vide available history for new businesses, with federal and state wage and hour laws; and
(h) Provide quarterly reporting  and recordkeeping to the project owner or electric utility
and respond to records requests and verification.
(3) In addition to the requirements in subsection (2) of this section, a person constructing
or repowering a large-scale project shall require all contractors and subcontractors  working
on the construction or repowering project to:
(a) Pay the area wage standard for an hour’s work in the same trade or occupation  in
the locality where the labor is  performed. Area wage standard includes the calculation of
wages and fringe benefits per trade and locality and  will be treated as standards defined in
ORS 279C.800 et seq.
(b) Offer health care and retirement benefits to  the employees performing the labor on
the project.
(c) Provide quarterly reporting and recordkeeping to  the project owner or electric utility
and respond to records requests and verification.
(4) A person constructing or repowering  a large-scale project shall provide the
attestation or declaration  and good faith effort documentation described in subsection (2) of
this section to the State Department of Energy within 30 days  from the date construction
begins and provide notice of such delivery to the purchaser  of the project or of the energy
Enrolled House Bill 2021 (HB 2021-C) Page 18
from the project. In addition to the requirements described in subsection (2) of this  section,
an attestation must include the following information:
(a) The megawatt capacity and physical footprint in acres of the project;
(b) The geographic location of the project;
(c) The estimated workforce requirements of the project;
(d) A collated list of good faith effort documentation; and
(e) A description of any  policies in place for ensuring the person meets the requirements
in this section.
(5)(a) In lieu of providing an attestation or declaration  described in subsection (2) of this
section, a person may provide a copy of a project labor agreement, if a  project labor agree-
ment is used on the  large-scale project and shall be exempted from the requirements de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section.
(b) As used in this subsection, “project labor agreement” means a prehire  collective
bargaining agreement as described in 29 U.S.C. 158  (f) that establishes the terms and condi-
tions of employment for a specific construction project or contract.
(c) A project labor agreement may include additional provisions that:
(A) Prohibit discrimination  based on race, national origin, religion, gender, sexual orien-
tation, political affiliation or  membership in a labor organization in hiring and dispatching
workers for the project.
(B) Permit qualified contractors and subcontractors to bid  for and be awarded work on
the project without regard to whether they are otherwise  parties to a collective bargaining
agreement.
(C) Permit and promote qualified business  enterprises owned by women, minorities, vet-
erans and disadvantaged individuals without regard to whether  the individuals are otherwise
parties to a collective bargaining agreement.
(D) Guarantee against  work stoppages, strikes, lockouts and similar disruptions of the
project.
(6)(a) The department shall retain an  attestation or declaration filed with the department
in a manner consistent with the department’s record retention policies.
(b) Notwithstanding any provisions of ORS 192.345 or  192.355, an attestation or declara-
tion provided to the department pursuant to this subsection is subject to public records dis-
closure and the  department shall provide a copy of the attestation or declaration upon
request.
(c) An  attestation or declaration filed under this section is for reporting purposes only
and the  department may not use an attestation or declaration to investigate, regulate or
enforce matters addressed in the attestation or declaration.
SECTION 27.
The obligation to provide an attestation or declaration pursuant to section
26 of this 2021 Act applies to large-scale project  contracts finalized or executed on or after
the effective date of this 2021 Act.
NATURAL GAS PLANTS
SECTION 28. Notwithstanding ORS 469.320 and 469.405, the Energy Facility Siting Council
may not:
(1) Issue a site certificate for a new generating  facility that produces electric power from
fossil fuels, including natural gas, petroleum, coal or any form of solid, liquid or  gaseous fuel
derived from such  material, unless the council determines that a new generating facility will
generate only nonemitting electricity as defined in section 1 of this 2021 Act; or
(2) Approve the  amendment of a site certificate for an energy facility described under
subsection (1) of this section that was granted prior to the effective date of this 2021  Act in
a manner that would significantly increase the  gross carbon dioxide emissions that are rea-
sonably likely to result from the operation of the energy facility.
Enrolled House Bill 2021 (HB 2021-C) Page 19
COMMUNITY RENEWABLE ENERGY PROJECT GRANT PROGRAM
SECTION 29. Definitions. As used in sections 29 to 32 of this 2021 Act:
(1) “Community renewable energy project” means  one or more renewable energy sys-
tems, storage systems, microgrids or energy-related infrastructures that promote energy
resilience, increase renewable energy generation or  renewable energy storage capacity and
provide a direct benefit to a particular community in the form  of increased community en-
ergy resilience, local jobs, economic development or direct energy costs  savings to families
and small businesses.
(2) “Community energy resilience” means the ability of a specific community to  maintain
the availability of energy needed to support the provision of energy-dependent  critical public
services to the community following  nonroutine disruptions of severe impact or duration to
the state’s broader energy systems.
(3) “Community energy resilience project” means a community  renewable energy project
that includes utilizing one or more renewable energy systems to support the  energy
resilience of structures or facilities that are essential to the public welfare.
(4) “Consumer-owned utility” means a municipal electricity  utility, a people’s utility dis-
trict organized under ORS chapter 261 that sells electricity or  an electric cooperative or-
ganized under ORS chapter 62.
(5) “Energy resilience” means the ability of energy systems, from production  through
delivery to end-users, to withstand and restore energy delivery rapidly  following nonroutine
disruptions of severe impact or duration.
(6) “Planning costs” means the costs related  to planning paid by an applicant described
under section 30 of this 2021 Act.
(7) “Project cost” means the actual cost of the acquisition, construction and installation
of a renewable energy system  incurred by an applicant described under section 30 of this 2021
Act for the system, before considering utility incentives.
(8) “Public body” means a public body as defined in ORS 174.109.
(9) “Qualifying community”  means a community that qualifies as an environmental jus-
tice community as defined in section 1 of this 2021 Act.
(10) “Renewable energy system” includes:
(a) A system that uses biomass, solar, geothermal, hydroelectric,  wind, landfill gas,
biogas or wave, tidal or ocean thermal energy technology to produce energy.
(b) One or more energy  storage systems paired with an existing or newly constructed
system described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) One or more vehicle  charging stations paired with an existing or newly constructed
system described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(d) Microgrid enabling technologies, including microgrid controllers and any other related
technologies needed to electrically isolate  a community energy resilience project from the
electric grid so that the project is capable of operating independently from the electric grid.
SECTION 30.
Grants for community renewable  energy projects; application; standards;
rules. (1) The Community Renewable Investment Program is established for the purpose of:
(a) Offsetting the cost of planning and developing community renewable energy  projects;
(b) Making community  renewable energy projects economically feasible for qualifying
communities;
(c) Promoting small-scale renewable energy projects; and
(d) Providing direct benefits to communities across this  state in the form of increased
community energy resilience,  local jobs, economic development or direct energy cost savings
to families and small businesses.
(2)(a) A federally recognized Oregon Indian tribe, public body  or consumer-owned utility
may submit to the State  Department of Energy an application for grant moneys from the
Enrolled House Bill 2021 (HB 2021-C) Page 20
Community Renewable Investment Fund established under section 33 of this 2021 Act for  the
purpose of planning or developing a community renewable energy project.
(b) An applicant may partner with a  federally recognized Oregon Indian tribe, public
body, nonprofit entity, private business with a business  site in this state or owner of rental
property in this  state, but a grant for an approved application will only be awarded and re-
leased to an applicant that is a federally  recognized Oregon Indian tribe, public body or
consumer-owned utility. Any federally  recognized Oregon Indian tribe, public body, nonprofit
entity, private business or  owner of rental property that partners with the applicant must
be listed in the application.
(c) An application must be drafted in consultation with electric utilities that  have cus-
tomers in the communities covered  by a community renewable energy project that is in the
application and regional stakeholders for the purpose of ensuring feasibility.
(3) An application for a grant for planning a community renewable energy  project must
demonstrate that the planning:
(a) Is for a project located in this state  but outside a city with a population of 500,000
or more;
(b) Will be completed within six months of execution of the performance agreement  or
a reasonable time frame if good cause to extend the deadline is  demonstrated as determined
by rule;
(c) Will result in a proposal for developing a community renewable energy project; and
(d) Incorporates feedback from:
(A) Members of qualifying communities served by the community renewable energy
project;
(B) Businesses located  in the communities served by the community renewable energy
project;
(C) Electric utilities that have customers in the  communities served by the community
renewable energy project; and
(D) Other regional stakeholders.
(4)(a) An application for a grant for developing a community renewable energy project
must be on a form prescribed by the department and contain:
(A) A detailed description of the project’s systems and the systems’ operation;
(B) Information showing that the project’s systems will operate  as represented in the
application and, if the project is  for producing electricity, remain in operation for at least
five years or for at least a period of time established by the Director of the State Department
of Energy by rule;
(C) The anticipated total project cost;
(D) Information on the number and types of jobs directly  connected to the awarding of
the grant that will be:
(i) Created by the project; and
(ii) Sustained throughout construction, installation and operation of the project;
(E) Information demonstrating that the project will comply  with applicable state and lo-
cal laws and regulations and obtain required licenses and permits;
(F) Information demonstrating that the  project will be located in and benefit a commu-
nity in this state but outside a city with a population of 500,000 or more; and
(G) Any other  information the director considers necessary to determine whether the
project is  in compliance with sections 29 to 32 of this 2021 Act and any applicable rules or
standards adopted thereunder.
(b) An application for developing a community renewable energy project must demon-
strate that the project:
(A) Is located in this state but outside a city with a population of 500,000 or more;
Enrolled House Bill 2021 (HB 2021-C) Page 21
(B) Will begin construction  within 12 months of execution of the performance agreement
and be completed within 36 months of execution of the performance agreement or a reason-
able time frame if good cause to extend the deadline is demonstrated as determined  by rule;
(C) Results in increased community energy  resilience, local jobs, economic development
or direct energy cost savings to families and small businesses;
(D) Complies with applicable state and  local laws and regulations and has the required
licenses and permits;
(E) Does not exceed 20 megawatts of nameplate capacity, if the project is for generating
renewable energy; and
(F) Will operate  for at least five years, if the project is for producing electricity, or for
at least a period of time established by the director by rule.
(5) Upon receipt of  an application submitted under this section, the department shall
review and determine whether the applicant is eligible to receive a grant from the  Commu-
nity Renewable Investment Program established under this section. The department may
approve an application if the department finds that:
(a) The planning or development proposal meets the requirements listed in subsection (3)
or (4) of this section;
(b) The proposal meets the standards described in subsection (10) of this section;
(c) The proposal  meets any standards adopted by rule under subsection (11) of this sec-
tion;
(d) The proposal is technically feasible; and
(e) Any federally recognized Oregon  Indian tribe, public body, private business or owner
of rental property partnered with the applicant is listed in the application.
(6)(a) The department shall issue separate opportunity  announcements for each calendar
interval that funding is available for the following categories:
(A) Planning a community renewable energy project that qualifies  as a community en-
ergy resilience project;
(B) Developing a community renewable energy project that qualifies as a community en-
ergy resilience project;
(C) Planning a community renewable energy project that does not qualify as a community
energy resilience project; and
(D) Developing a community renewable energy project that does not qualify as a com-
munity energy resilience project.
(b) Upon receiving an application, the director shall determine  whether the application
is for a community renewable energy project that qualifies as a community energy resilience
project based on the definition of  “community energy resilience project” in section 29 of this
2021 Act and any applicable rules adopted under this section.
(7)(a) The department  shall allocate, out of the initial moneys appropriated for the
Community Renewable Investment Program under section 34 of this 2021 Act:
(A) 50 percent or more for grants to be  awarded for planning or developing community
renewable energy projects that qualify as community energy resilience projects.
(B) 50 percent or more for  grants to be awarded for planning or developing community
renewable energy projects that primarily serve one or more qualifying communities.
(b) The department shall allocate, out of any  subsequent and additional moneys appro-
priated to the Community Renewable Investment Program, percentage  amounts for grants
in a manner consistent with paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) After two years of issuing announcements of available funding opportunities from the
initial moneys appropriated to the Community Renewable Investment  Program and after
consultation with the Advisory Committee  on Community Renewable Investment described
in section 32 of this  2021 Act, the department may, by rule, reallocate the percentage of
available funds across project categories.
Enrolled House Bill 2021 (HB 2021-C) Page 22
(8) The department shall review and competitively score applications separately for each
funding opportunity announcement.
(9) If the department  approves an application under this section, the department and the
applicant may enter into a performance  agreement that meets the requirements set forth in
section 31 of this 2021 Act.
(10) In approving applications and awarding grant moneys, the department shall prioritize
planning and development proposals that:
(a) Include community energy resilience projects.
(b) Demonstrate significant prior investments in energy efficiency measures  at the
project location or will result in aggregate improvements to demand response capabilities.
(c) Are for projects located in qualifying communities across the state.
(d) When applicable, are  for projects constructed in part or in whole by disadvantaged
business enterprises, emerging small businesses or businesses that are owned  by minorities,
women or disabled veterans.
(e) Include inclusive hiring and promotion policies for workers working on the projects.
(f) Incorporate equity metrics developed in  coordination with the Environmental Justice
Task Force  established by ORS 182.538 for evaluating the involvement of and leadership by
people of low income, Black, Indigenous  or People of Color, members of tribal communities,
people with disabilities,  youth, people from rural communities and people from otherwise
disadvantaged communities in the siting,  planning, designing or evaluating of the proposed
community renewable energy projects.
(g) Help the applicants achieve goals included in the applicants’ natural hazard mitigation
plans as approved by the Federal Emergency Management Agency.
(11) The department shall adopt  rules, in consultation with Business Oregon, to carry out
sections 29 to 32 of this 2021 Act. The rules must:
(a) Define the  planning and project costs eligible to be covered by a grant provided under
section 31 (1) and (2) of this 2021 Act.
(b) Adopt a methodology  to identify qualifying communities and assess the geographic
diversity of the approved planning  and development projects compared with the other plan-
ning and development project applications for which grants have been  requested in each op-
portunity announcement.
(c) Establish  guidelines for significant, unforeseeable or uncontrollable delays that will
constitute good cause for extending the time lines agreed upon in performance agreements.
(12) The department may  adopt rules capping the amount of grant funds that may be paid
to individual consultants and  contractors in each round of funding opportunity announce-
ments if the department finds such limitations necessary to ensure  broad distribution of
funds and opportunity for emerging small businesses as defined in ORS 200.005.
SECTION 31.
Performance agreements; requirements.  (1)(a) A performance agreement
for planning a community renewable energy project entered into between the State  Depart-
ment of Energy and an applicant under section 30 (9) of this  2021 Act must provide, at a
minimum:
(A) A grant in an amount  described in paragraph (b) of this subsection that covers up
to 100 percent of the reasonable planning costs including, but not limited  to, costs associated
with:
(i) Consulting fees.
(ii) Load analysis.
(iii) Siting, excluding property acquisition.
(iv) Ensuring code compliance.
(v) Interconnection studies.
(vi) Transmission studies.
(vii) Other reasonable expenditures made in the community renewable energy  project
planning process as determined by the department by rule.
Enrolled House Bill 2021 (HB 2021-C) Page 23
(B) A grant  may not be used to cover any fixed costs the applicant would incur in the
applicant’s normal course of business such as existing staff salaries or overhead costs.
(C) The department may recover grant moneys if a  project fails to abide by the per-
formance agreement or if planning is not completed within six months  of execution of the
performance agreement or a reasonable time frame if good cause to  extend the deadline is
demonstrated as determined by rule.
(b) The department may establish differing limits on the maximum  amount of grants for
planning community renewable energy projects based on  the scope and attributes of the
planning applications not to exceed an amount of $100,000 per grant.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the department may provide a grant
that covers up to 100 percent of the reasonable planning costs only if the  application dem-
onstrates the planning proposal is for a community renewable energy project that:
(A) If for producing energy:
(i) Will make use of an adequately  available renewable energy resource to produce the
energy;
(ii) Has a specific market for the energy; and
(iii) Will reasonably and efficiently connect or transmit the  energy to the specific com-
munity identified in the application under section 30 (3) of this 2021 Act; or
(B) If for increasing energy resilience:
(i) Will increase the energy resilience of a specific structure or facility or collection of
structures or facilities essential to the public welfare; and
(ii) Will provide energy resilience benefits to the specific structure or  facility or to the
collection of structures or facilities.
(2) A performance agreement for developing  a community renewable energy project en-
tered into between the State  Department of Energy and an applicant under section 30 (9) of
this 2021 Act must provide, at a minimum:
(a) For a community renewable energy project that qualifies  as a community energy
resilience project, a grant  that covers up to 100 percent of the project cost not to exceed $1
million. The department shall reduce the grant amount, if  the grant combined with other
incentives and grants received  by the applicant exceeds 100 percent of the total costs asso-
ciated with the project.
(b) For a community renewable  energy project that does not qualify as a community
energy resilience project,  a grant that covers up to 50 percent of the project cost not to ex-
ceed $1 million. The department shall reduce the grant amount, if the grant combined  with
other incentives and grants received by the applicant exceeds 100 percent of the  total costs
associated with the project.
(c) The department may release up to 30 percent of the grant moneys provided for  in a
performance agreement, not  to exceed 30 percent of project cost, upon entering into a per-
formance agreement with an applicant  for developing a community renewable energy project,
with the remaining  grant moneys to be released upon project completion under the terms
of the performance agreement, if upon  entering the performance agreement the applicant
demonstrates having:
(A) Taken meaningful steps to seek site control, including but not limited to an  option
to lease or purchase the  site or an executed letter of intent or exclusivity agreement to ne-
gotiate an option to lease or purchase the site;
(B) Filed a request for interconnection with a host utility or  appropriate transmission
provider; and
(C) Met any other requirements  provided by the department by rule, such as filing a re-
quest for a power purchase or net metering agreement.
(d) The department may recover grant moneys if:
(A) The project fails to abide by the performance agreement;
Enrolled House Bill 2021 (HB 2021-C) Page 24
(B) The project fails to begin  construction within 12 months of execution of the per-
formance agreement or a reasonable time  frame if good cause to extend the deadline is
demonstrated as determined by rule; or
(C) The project is not completed within 36 months of execution  of the performance
agreement or a reasonable time frame if good  cause to extend the deadline is demonstrated
as determined by rule.
(3) The department shall gather information from grantees necessary to  evaluate indi-
cators of success as determined by rule.
SECTION 32. Advisory committee.  The Director of the State Department of Energy  may
appoint an Advisory Committee on  Community Renewable Investment to provide consulta-
tion on the implementation of sections  29 to 32 of this 2021 Act. A committee appointed un-
der this section shall consist of:
(1) A member of the Environmental Justice Task Force;
(2) A representative of Business Oregon;
(3) A representative of electric companies;
(4) A representative of consumer-owned utilities;
(5) A representative from an organization that represents community  renewable energy
development;
(6) A representative from a federally recognized Oregon Indian tribe;
(7) Three representatives of local government to represent the  interests of counties,
cities and special districts;
(8) Representatives from nongovernmental organizations  that represent communities of
low income or disadvantaged households; and
(9) Representatives from relevant state  and federal emergency management or response
agencies.
SECTION 33.
Community Renewable Investment Fund;  uses.  (1) The Community
Renewable Investment Fund is established in the State  Treasury, separate and distinct from
the General Fund. Interest earned by the Community  Renewable Investment Fund shall be
credited to the fund. The fund consists of:
(a) Moneys appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assem-
bly;
(b) Moneys received from federal, state or local sources;
(c) Gifts, grants or other moneys contributed to the fund; and
(d) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source.
(2) Moneys in the fund  are continuously appropriated to the State Department of Energy
for the purpose of providing grants to applicants approved under section 30 of this 2021  Act.
(3) The department may use reasonable amounts from the fund necessary, but no more
than 10 percent of  the fund, to administer the Community Renewable Investment Program
described in section 30 of this 2021 Act.
(4) The Director of the State Department  of Energy shall submit a biennial report to the
Legislative Assembly in the manner provided by ORS 293.640 regarding the expenditures of
moneys deposited  in the Community Renewable Investment Fund and status of ongoing
projects funded by the moneys, including but not limited indicators of program success.
(5) Upon the expenditure of all grant moneys in the Community Renewable Investment
Fund or four years  from the effective date of this 2021 Act, whichever occurs earlier, the
director shall submit  a report to the Legislative Assembly regarding the expenditures of
moneys deposited  in the Community Renewable Investment Fund and status of ongoing
projects that  have received moneys from the fund, including but not limited to indicators of
program success.
SECTION 34.
Appropriations. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriations,
there is appropriated to the State Department of Energy,  for the biennium beginning July
Enrolled House Bill 2021 (HB 2021-C) Page 25
1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $50,000,000 for deposit into the Community
Renewable Investment Fund established in section 33 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 35. Department of Energy;  other funds limitation. Notwithstanding any other
law limiting expenditures, the amount of $26,960,291 is established for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by  the State Department of
Energy for community renewable  energy project grants from the Community Renewable In-
vestment Fund established by section 33 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 36. Operative date. (1) Sections 30 and 31 of this 2021 Act  become operative on
January 1, 2022.
(2) The State Department of Energy  may take any action before the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this  section that is necessary to enable the department to ex-
ercise, on or after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of  this section, all of the
duties, functions and powers conferred on the  department by sections 30 and 31 of this 2021
Act.
SMALL-SCALE RENEWABLE ENERGY PROJECTS
SECTION 37.  ORS 469A.210 is amended to read:
469A.210. (1) The Legislative Assembly finds that community-based renewable energy projects,
including but not limited to marine renewable energy resources that  are either developed in ac-
cordance with the Territorial Sea Plan adopted pursuant to ORS 196.471 or located on structures
adjacent to the coastal shorelands, are an essential element of this state’s energy future.
(2) For purposes  related to the findings in subsection (1) of this section, by the year [2025]
2030, at least [ eight] 10 percent of the aggregate electrical capacity of all electric companies that
make sales of electricity to 25,000 or more retail electricity consumers in  this state must be com-
posed of electricity generated by one or both of the following sources:
(a) Small-scale renewable energy projects with  a generating capacity of 20 megawatts or less
that generate electricity utilizing a type of energy described in ORS 469A.025; or
(b) Facilities that generate  electricity using biomass that also generate thermal energy for a
secondary purpose.
(3) Regardless of the facility’s nameplate capacity, any single facility  described in subsection
(2)(b) of this section may  be used to comply with the requirement specified in subsection (2) of this
section for up to 20 megawatts of capacity.
MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 38.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (1), chapter , Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House
Bill 5032),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or  received by the Public Utility Commis-
sion, for the utility program, is increased  by $1,867,217, for the implementation of this 2021
Act.
SECTION 39. The unit and section captions used in this 2021 Act are provided only  for
the convenience of the reader  and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or
express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 40. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 2021 (HB 2021-C) Page 26
Passed by House June 25, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2021 (HB 2021-C) Page 27